Washington statutes.
RCW 27.54.030

Washington state historical society—Administrative responsibilities. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

(1) The semiquincentennial committee is attached to the Washington state historical society for administrative purposes. Accordingly, the society shall:

(a) Direct and supervise the budgeting, recordkeeping, reporting, and related administrative and clerical functions of the committee;

(b) Include the committee's budgetary requests in the society's departmental budget;

(c) Collect all nonappropriated revenues for the committee and deposit them in the proper fund or account;

(d) Provide staff support for the committee; and

(e) Print and disseminate for the committee any required notices, rules, or orders adopted by the committee.

(2) The Washington state historical society may employ personnel, contract for services, and receive, expend, and allocate gifts, grants, and donations on behalf of the committee. The society shall expend and allocate any appropriations authorized by the legislature to carry out the purposes of the committee.

[ 2022 c 97 s 3.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2022 c 97: See note following RCW 27.54.010.